Illinois, session 104th, HB1142.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Sections 11-74.4-5 and 11-74.4-6 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/11-74.4-5)  (from Ch. 24, par. 11-74.4-5)7    Sec. 11-74.4-5. Public hearing; joint review board. 8    (a) The changes made by this amendatory Act of the 91st 9General Assembly do not apply to a municipality that, (i) 10before the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 91st 11General Assembly, has adopted an ordinance or resolution 12fixing a time and place for a public hearing under this Section 13or (ii) before July 1, 1999, has adopted an ordinance or 14resolution providing for a feasibility study under Section 1511-74.4-4.1, but has not yet adopted an ordinance approving 16redevelopment plans and redevelopment projects or designating 17redevelopment project areas under Section 11-74.4-4, until 18after that municipality adopts an ordinance approving 19redevelopment plans and redevelopment projects or designating 20redevelopment project areas under Section 11-74.4-4; 21thereafter the changes made by this amendatory Act of the 91st 22General Assembly apply to the same extent that they apply to 23redevelopment plans and redevelopment projects that were   HB1142- 2 -LRB104 04065 RTM 14089 b1approved and redevelopment projects that were designated 2before the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 91st 3General Assembly.4    Prior to the adoption of an ordinance proposing the 5designation of a redevelopment project area, or approving a 6redevelopment plan or redevelopment project, the municipality 7by its corporate authorities, or as it may determine by any 8commission designated under subsection (k) of Section 911-74.4-4 shall adopt an ordinance or resolution fixing a time 10and place for public hearing. The ordinance or resolution 11fixing the time and place for a public hearing shall also 12initiate the submission of a referendum to approve the 13designation of the redevelopment project area under subsection 14(a-5), and the ordinance or resolution must be adopted no less 15than 79 days before the regularly scheduled election at which 16the referendum will be held. At least 10 days prior to the 17adoption of the ordinance or resolution establishing the time 18and place for the public hearing, the municipality shall make 19available for public inspection a redevelopment plan or a 20separate report that provides in reasonable detail the basis 21for the eligibility of the redevelopment project area. The 22report along with the name of a person to contact for further 23information shall be sent within a reasonable time after the 24adoption of such ordinance or resolution to the affected 25taxing districts by certified mail. On and after the effective 26date of this amendatory Act of the 91st General Assembly, the   HB1142- 3 -LRB104 04065 RTM 14089 b1municipality shall print in a newspaper of general circulation 2within the municipality a notice that interested persons may 3register with the municipality in order to receive information 4on the proposed designation of a redevelopment project area or 5the approval of a redevelopment plan. The notice shall state 6the place of registration and the operating hours of that 7place. The municipality shall have adopted reasonable rules to 8implement this registration process under Section 11-74.4-4.2. 9The municipality shall provide notice of the availability of 10the redevelopment plan and eligibility report, including how 11to obtain this information, by mail within a reasonable time 12after the adoption of the ordinance or resolution, to all 13residential addresses that, after a good faith effort, the 14municipality determines are located outside the proposed 15redevelopment project area and within 750 feet of the 16boundaries of the proposed redevelopment project area. This 17requirement is subject to the limitation that in a 18municipality with a population of over 100,000, if the total 19number of residential addresses outside the proposed 20redevelopment project area and within 750 feet of the 21boundaries of the proposed redevelopment project area exceeds 22750, the municipality shall be required to provide the notice 23to only the 750 residential addresses that, after a good faith 24effort, the municipality determines are outside the proposed 25redevelopment project area and closest to the boundaries of 26the proposed redevelopment project area. Notwithstanding the   HB1142- 4 -LRB104 04065 RTM 14089 b1foregoing, notice given after August 7, 2001 (the effective 2date of Public Act 92-263) and before the effective date of 3this amendatory Act of the 92nd General Assembly to 4residential addresses within 750 feet of the boundaries of a 5proposed redevelopment project area shall be deemed to have 6been sufficiently given in compliance with this Act if given 7only to residents outside the boundaries of the proposed 8redevelopment project area. The notice shall also be provided 9by the municipality, regardless of its population, to those 10organizations and residents that have registered with the 11municipality for that information in accordance with the 12registration guidelines established by the municipality under 13Section 11-74.4-4.2.14    At the public hearing any interested person or affected 15taxing district may file with the municipal clerk written 16objections to and may be heard orally in respect to any issues 17embodied in the notice. The municipality shall hear all 18protests and objections at the hearing and the hearing may be 19adjourned to another date without further notice other than a 20motion to be entered upon the minutes fixing the time and place 21of the subsequent hearing. At the public hearing or at any time 22prior to the adoption by the municipality of an ordinance 23approving a redevelopment plan, the municipality may make 24changes in the redevelopment plan. Changes which (1) add 25additional parcels of property to the proposed redevelopment 26project area, (2) substantially affect the general land uses   HB1142- 5 -LRB104 04065 RTM 14089 b1proposed in the redevelopment plan, (3) substantially change 2the nature of or extend the life of the redevelopment project, 3or (4) increase the number of inhabited residential units to 4be displaced from the redevelopment project area, as measured 5from the time of creation of the redevelopment project area, 6to a total of more than 10, shall be made only after the 7municipality gives notice, convenes a joint review board, and 8conducts a public hearing pursuant to the procedures set forth 9in this Section and in Section 11-74.4-6 of this Act. Changes 10which do not (1) add additional parcels of property to the 11proposed redevelopment project area, (2) substantially affect 12the general land uses proposed in the redevelopment plan, (3) 13substantially change the nature of or extend the life of the 14redevelopment project, or (4) increase the number of inhabited 15residential units to be displaced from the redevelopment 16project area, as measured from the time of creation of the 17redevelopment project area, to a total of more than 10, may be 18made without further hearing, provided that the municipality 19shall give notice of any such changes by mail to each affected 20taxing district and registrant on the interested parties 21registry, provided for under Section 11-74.4-4.2, and by 22publication in a newspaper of general circulation within the 23affected taxing district. Such notice by mail and by 24publication shall each occur not later than 10 days following 25the adoption by ordinance of such changes. Hearings with 26regard to a redevelopment project area, project or plan may be   HB1142- 6 -LRB104 04065 RTM 14089 b1held simultaneously.2    (a-5) After adoption of an ordinance or resolution fixing 3the time and place for a public hearing under subsection (a), 4the city clerk shall certify the question of approving the 5designation of the redevelopment project for submission to the 6voters of all of the taxing districts that constitute the 7joint review board under subsection (b) to the appropriate 8election authority. Prior to the adoption of the ordinance 9designating the redevelopment project area, the voters of all 10of the taxing districts that constitute the joint review board 11must first approve the referendum to designate the 12redevelopment project area. The referendum shall be 13substantially in the following form: 14------------------------------------------------------------- 15    Shall (name of the municipality) 16establish a redevelopment project 17area within (general description of 18the redevelopment project area) for 19(the purposes of the redevelopment 20project area)? 21-------------------------------------------------------------22    The votes shall be recorded as "Yes" or "No". The 23referendum is approved when a majority of the voters in each of 24the affected taxing districts approve the referendum. 25    (b) Prior to holding a public hearing to approve or amend a 26redevelopment plan or to designate or add additional parcels   HB1142- 7 -LRB104 04065 RTM 14089 b1of property to a redevelopment project area, the municipality 2shall convene a joint review board. The board shall consist of 3a representative selected by each community college district, 4local elementary school district and high school district or 5each local community unit school district, park district, 6library district, township, fire protection district, and 7county that will have the authority to directly levy taxes on 8the property within the proposed redevelopment project area at 9the time that the proposed redevelopment project area is 10approved, a representative selected by the municipality and a 11public member. The public member shall first be selected and 12then the board's chairperson shall be selected by a majority 13of the board members present and voting.14    For redevelopment project areas with redevelopment plans 15or proposed redevelopment plans that would result in the 16displacement of residents from 10 or more inhabited 17residential units or that include 75 or more inhabited 18residential units, the public member shall be a person who 19resides in the redevelopment project area. If, as determined 20by the housing impact study provided for in paragraph (5) of 21subsection (n) of Section 11-74.4-3, or if no housing impact 22study is required then based on other reasonable data, the 23majority of residential units are occupied by very low, low, 24or moderate income households, as defined in Section 3 of the 25Illinois Affordable Housing Act, the public member shall be a 26person who resides in very low, low, or moderate income   HB1142- 8 -LRB104 04065 RTM 14089 b1housing within the redevelopment project area. Municipalities 2with fewer than 15,000 residents shall not be required to 3select a person who lives in very low, low, or moderate income 4housing within the redevelopment project area, provided that 5the redevelopment plan or project will not result in 6displacement of residents from 10 or more inhabited units, and 7the municipality so certifies in the plan. If no person 8satisfying these requirements is available or if no qualified 9person will serve as the public member, then the joint review 10board is relieved of this paragraph's selection requirements 11for the public member.12    Within 90 days of the effective date of this amendatory 13Act of the 91st General Assembly, each municipality that 14designated a redevelopment project area for which it was not 15required to convene a joint review board under this Section 16shall convene a joint review board to perform the duties 17specified under paragraph (e) of this Section.18    All board members shall be appointed and the first board 19meeting shall be held at least 14 days but not more than 28 20days after the mailing of notice by the municipality to the 21taxing districts as required by Section 11-74.4-6(c). 22Notwithstanding the preceding sentence, a municipality that 23adopted either a public hearing resolution or a feasibility 24resolution between July 1, 1999 and July 1, 2000 that called 25for the meeting of the joint review board within 14 days of 26notice of public hearing to affected taxing districts is   HB1142- 9 -LRB104 04065 RTM 14089 b1deemed to be in compliance with the notice, meeting, and 2public hearing provisions of the Act. Such notice shall also 3advise the taxing bodies represented on the joint review board 4of the time and place of the first meeting of the board. 5Additional meetings of the board shall be held upon the call of 6any member. The municipality seeking designation of the 7redevelopment project area shall provide administrative 8support to the board.9    The board shall review (i) the public record, planning 10documents and proposed ordinances approving the redevelopment 11plan and project and (ii) proposed amendments to the 12redevelopment plan or additions of parcels of property to the 13redevelopment project area to be adopted by the municipality. 14As part of its deliberations, the board may hold additional 15hearings on the proposal. A board's recommendation shall be an 16advisory, non-binding recommendation. The recommendation shall 17be adopted by a majority of those members present and voting. 18The recommendations shall be submitted to the municipality 19within 30 days after convening of the board. Failure of the 20board to submit its report on a timely basis shall not be cause 21to delay the public hearing or any other step in the process of 22designating or amending the redevelopment project area but 23shall be deemed to constitute approval by the joint review 24board of the matters before it.25    The board shall base its recommendation to approve or 26disapprove the redevelopment plan and the designation of the   HB1142- 10 -LRB104 04065 RTM 14089 b1redevelopment project area or the amendment of the 2redevelopment plan or addition of parcels of property to the 3redevelopment project area on the basis of the redevelopment 4project area and redevelopment plan satisfying the plan 5requirements, the eligibility criteria defined in Section 611-74.4-3, and the objectives of this Act.7    The board shall issue a written report describing why the 8redevelopment plan and project area or the amendment thereof 9meets or fails to meet one or more of the objectives of this 10Act and both the plan requirements and the eligibility 11criteria defined in Section 11-74.4-3. In the event the Board 12does not file a report it shall be presumed that these taxing 13bodies find the redevelopment project area and redevelopment 14plan satisfy the objectives of this Act and the plan 15requirements and eligibility criteria.16    If the board recommends rejection of the matters before 17it, the municipality will have 30 days within which to 18resubmit the plan or amendment. During this period, the 19municipality will meet and confer with the board and attempt 20to resolve those issues set forth in the board's written 21report that led to the rejection of the plan or amendment.22    Notwithstanding the resubmission set forth above, the 23municipality may commence the scheduled public hearing and 24either adjourn the public hearing or continue the public 25hearing until a date certain. Prior to continuing any public 26hearing to a date certain, the municipality shall announce   HB1142- 11 -LRB104 04065 RTM 14089 b1during the public hearing the time, date, and location for the 2reconvening of the public hearing. Any changes to the 3redevelopment plan necessary to satisfy the issues set forth 4in the joint review board report shall be the subject of a 5public hearing before the hearing is adjourned if the changes 6would (1) substantially affect the general land uses proposed 7in the redevelopment plan, (2) substantially change the nature 8of or extend the life of the redevelopment project, or (3) 9increase the number of inhabited residential units to be 10displaced from the redevelopment project area, as measured 11from the time of creation of the redevelopment project area, 12to a total of more than 10. Changes to the redevelopment plan 13necessary to satisfy the issues set forth in the joint review 14board report shall not require any further notice or convening 15of a joint review board meeting, except that any changes to the 16redevelopment plan that would add additional parcels of 17property to the proposed redevelopment project area shall be 18subject to the notice, public hearing, and joint review board 19meeting requirements established for such changes by 20subsection (a) of Section 11-74.4-5.21    In the event that the municipality and the board are 22unable to resolve these differences, or in the event that the 23resubmitted plan or amendment is rejected by the board, the 24municipality may proceed with the plan or amendment, but only 25upon a three-fifths vote of the corporate authority 26responsible for approval of the plan or amendment, excluding   HB1142- 12 -LRB104 04065 RTM 14089 b1positions of members that are vacant and those members that 2are ineligible to vote because of conflicts of interest.3    (c) After a municipality has by ordinance approved a 4redevelopment plan and designated a redevelopment project 5area, the plan may be amended and additional properties may be 6added to the redevelopment project area only as herein 7provided. Amendments which (1) add additional parcels of 8property to the proposed redevelopment project area, (2) 9substantially affect the general land uses proposed in the 10redevelopment plan, (3) substantially change the nature of the 11redevelopment project, (4) increase the total estimated 12redevelopment project costs set out in the redevelopment plan 13by more than 5% after adjustment for inflation from the date 14the plan was adopted, (5) add additional redevelopment project 15costs to the itemized list of redevelopment project costs set 16out in the redevelopment plan, or (6) increase the number of 17inhabited residential units to be displaced from the 18redevelopment project area, as measured from the time of 19creation of the redevelopment project area, to a total of more 20than 10, shall be made only after the municipality gives 21notice, convenes a joint review board, and conducts a public 22hearing pursuant to the procedures set forth in this Section 23and in Section 11-74.4-6 of this Act. Changes which do not (1) 24add additional parcels of property to the proposed 25redevelopment project area, (2) substantially affect the 26general land uses proposed in the redevelopment plan, (3)   HB1142- 13 -LRB104 04065 RTM 14089 b1substantially change the nature of the redevelopment project, 2(4) increase the total estimated redevelopment project cost 3set out in the redevelopment plan by more than 5% after 4adjustment for inflation from the date the plan was adopted, 5(5) add additional redevelopment project costs to the itemized 6list of redevelopment project costs set out in the 7redevelopment plan, or (6) increase the number of inhabited 8residential units to be displaced from the redevelopment 9project area, as measured from the time of creation of the 10redevelopment project area, to a total of more than 10, may be 11made without further public hearing and related notices and 12procedures including the convening of a joint review board as 13set forth in Section 11-74.4-6 of this Act, provided that the 14municipality shall give notice of any such changes by mail to 15each affected taxing district and registrant on the interested 16parties registry, provided for under Section 11-74.4-4.2, and 17by publication in a newspaper of general circulation within 18the affected taxing district. Such notice by mail and by 19publication shall each occur not later than 10 days following 20the adoption by ordinance of such changes.21    (d) After the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 2291st General Assembly, a municipality shall submit in an 23electronic format the following information for each 24redevelopment project area (i) to the State Comptroller under 25Section 8-8-3.5 of the Illinois Municipal Code, subject to any 26extensions or exemptions provided at the Comptroller's   HB1142- 14 -LRB104 04065 RTM 14089 b1discretion under that Section, and (ii) to all taxing 2districts overlapping the redevelopment project area no later 3than 180 days after the close of each municipal fiscal year or 4as soon thereafter as the audited financial statements become 5available and, in any case, shall be submitted before the 6annual meeting of the Joint Review Board to each of the taxing 7districts that overlap the redevelopment project area:8        (1) Any amendments to the redevelopment plan, the 9    redevelopment project area, or the State Sales Tax 10    Boundary.11        (1.5) A list of the redevelopment project areas 12    administered by the municipality and, if applicable, the 13    date each redevelopment project area was designated or 14    terminated by the municipality.15        (2) Audited financial statements of the special tax 16    allocation fund once a cumulative total of $100,000 has 17    been deposited in the fund.18        (3) Certification of the Chief Executive Officer of 19    the municipality that the municipality has complied with 20    all of the requirements of this Act during the preceding 21    fiscal year.22        (4) An opinion of legal counsel that the municipality 23    is in compliance with this Act.24        (5) An analysis of the special tax allocation fund 25    which sets forth:26            (A) the balance in the special tax allocation fund   HB1142- 15 -LRB104 04065 RTM 14089 b1        at the beginning of the fiscal year;2            (B) all amounts deposited in the special tax 3        allocation fund by source;4            (C) an itemized list of all expenditures from the 5        special tax allocation fund by category of permissible 6        redevelopment project cost; and7            (D) the balance in the special tax allocation fund 8        at the end of the fiscal year including a breakdown of 9        that balance by source and a breakdown of that balance 10        identifying any portion of the balance that is 11        required, pledged, earmarked, or otherwise designated 12        for payment of or securing of obligations and 13        anticipated redevelopment project costs. Any portion 14        of such ending balance that has not been identified or 15        is not identified as being required, pledged, 16        earmarked, or otherwise designated for payment of or 17        securing of obligations or anticipated redevelopment 18        projects costs shall be designated as surplus as set 19        forth in Section 11-74.4-7 hereof.20        (6) A description of all property purchased by the 21    municipality within the redevelopment project area 22    including:23            (A) Street address.24            (B) Approximate size or description of property.25            (C) Purchase price.26            (D) Seller of property.  HB1142- 16 -LRB104 04065 RTM 14089 b1        (7) A statement setting forth all activities 2    undertaken in furtherance of the objectives of the 3    redevelopment plan, including:4            (A) Any project implemented in the preceding 5        fiscal year.6            (B) A description of the redevelopment activities 7        undertaken.8            (C) A description of any agreements entered into 9        by the municipality with regard to the disposition or 10        redevelopment of any property within the redevelopment 11        project area or the area within the State Sales Tax 12        Boundary.13            (D) Additional information on the use of all funds 14        received under this Division and steps taken by the 15        municipality to achieve the objectives of the 16        redevelopment plan.17            (E) Information regarding contracts that the 18        municipality's tax increment advisors or consultants 19        have entered into with entities or persons that have 20        received, or are receiving, payments financed by tax 21        increment revenues produced by the same redevelopment 22        project area.23            (F) Any reports submitted to the municipality by 24        the joint review board.25            (G) A review of public and, to the extent 26        possible, private investment actually undertaken to   HB1142- 17 -LRB104 04065 RTM 14089 b1        date after the effective date of this amendatory Act 2        of the 91st General Assembly and estimated to be 3        undertaken during the following year. This review 4        shall, on a project-by-project basis, set forth the 5        estimated amounts of public and private investment 6        incurred after the effective date of this amendatory 7        Act of the 91st General Assembly and provide the ratio 8        of private investment to public investment to the date 9        of the report and as estimated to the completion of the 10        redevelopment project.11        (8) With regard to any obligations issued by the 12    municipality:13            (A) copies of any official statements; and14            (B) an analysis prepared by financial advisor or 15        underwriter, chosen by the municipality, setting forth 16        the: (i) nature and term of obligation; (ii) projected 17        debt service including required reserves and debt 18        coverage; and (iii) actual debt service.19        (9) For special tax allocation funds that have 20    experienced cumulative deposits of incremental tax 21    revenues of $100,000 or more, a certified audit report 22    reviewing compliance with this Act performed by an 23    independent public accountant certified and licensed by 24    the authority of the State of Illinois. The financial 25    portion of the audit must be conducted in accordance with 26    Standards for Audits of Governmental Organizations,   HB1142- 18 -LRB104 04065 RTM 14089 b1    Programs, Activities, and Functions adopted by the 2    Comptroller General of the United States (1981), as 3    amended, or the standards specified by Section 8-8-5 of 4    the Illinois Municipal Auditing Law of the Illinois 5    Municipal Code. The audit report shall contain a letter 6    from the independent certified public accountant 7    indicating compliance or noncompliance with the 8    requirements of subsection (q) of Section 11-74.4-3. For 9    redevelopment plans or projects that would result in the 10    displacement of residents from 10 or more inhabited 11    residential units or that contain 75 or more inhabited 12    residential units, notice of the availability of the 13    information, including how to obtain the report, required 14    in this subsection shall also be sent by mail to all 15    residents or organizations that operate in the 16    municipality that register with the municipality for that 17    information according to registration procedures adopted 18    under Section 11-74.4-4.2. All municipalities are subject 19    to this provision.20        (10) A list of all intergovernmental agreements in 21    effect during the fiscal year to which the municipality is 22    a party and an accounting of any moneys transferred or 23    received by the municipality during that fiscal year 24    pursuant to those intergovernmental agreements. 25    In addition to information required to be reported under 26this Section, for Fiscal Year 2022 and each fiscal year   HB1142- 19 -LRB104 04065 RTM 14089 b1thereafter, reporting municipalities shall also report to the 2Comptroller annually in a manner and format prescribed by the 3Comptroller: (1) the number of jobs, if any, projected to be 4created for each redevelopment project area at the time of 5approval of the redevelopment agreement; (2) the number of 6jobs, if any, created as a result of the development to date 7for that reporting period under the same guidelines and 8assumptions as was used for the projections used at the time of 9approval of the redevelopment agreement; (3) the amount of 10increment projected to be created at the time of approval of 11the redevelopment agreement for each redevelopment project 12area; (4) the amount of increment created as a result of the 13development to date for that reporting period using the same 14assumptions as was used for the projections used at the time of 15the approval of the redevelopment agreement; and (5) the 16stated rate of return identified by the developer to the 17municipality for each redevelopment project area, if any. 18Stated rates of return required to be reported in item (5) 19shall be independently verified by a third party chosen by the 20municipality. Reporting municipalities shall also report to 21the Comptroller a copy of the redevelopment plan each time the 22redevelopment plan is enacted, amended, or extended in a 23manner and format prescribed by the Comptroller. These 24requirements shall only apply to redevelopment projects 25beginning in or after Fiscal Year 2022. 26    (d-1) Prior to the effective date of this amendatory Act   HB1142- 20 -LRB104 04065 RTM 14089 b1of the 91st General Assembly, municipalities with populations 2of over 1,000,000 shall, after adoption of a redevelopment 3plan or project, make available upon request to any taxing 4district in which the redevelopment project area is located 5the following information:6        (1) Any amendments to the redevelopment plan, the 7    redevelopment project area, or the State Sales Tax 8    Boundary; and9        (2) In connection with any redevelopment project area 10    for which the municipality has outstanding obligations 11    issued to provide for redevelopment project costs pursuant 12    to Section 11-74.4-7, audited financial statements of the 13    special tax allocation fund.14    (e) The joint review board shall meet annually 180 days 15after the close of the municipal fiscal year or as soon as the 16redevelopment project audit for that fiscal year becomes 17available to review the effectiveness and status of the 18redevelopment project area up to that date.19    (f) (Blank).20    (g) In the event that a municipality has held a public 21hearing under this Section prior to March 14, 1994 (the 22effective date of Public Act 88-537), the requirements imposed 23by Public Act 88-537 relating to the method of fixing the time 24and place for public hearing, the materials and information 25required to be made available for public inspection, and the 26information required to be sent after adoption of an ordinance   HB1142- 21 -LRB104 04065 RTM 14089 b1or resolution fixing a time and place for public hearing shall 2not be applicable.3    (h) On and after the effective date of this amendatory Act 4of the 96th General Assembly, the State Comptroller must post 5on the State Comptroller's official website the information 6submitted by a municipality pursuant to subsection (d) of this 7Section. The information must be posted no later than 45 days 8after the State Comptroller receives the information from the 9municipality. The State Comptroller must also post a list of 10the municipalities not in compliance with the reporting 11requirements set forth in subsection (d) of this Section.12    (i) No later than 10 years after the corporate authorities 13of a municipality adopt an ordinance to establish a 14redevelopment project area, the municipality must compile a 15status report concerning the redevelopment project area. The 16status report must detail without limitation the following: 17(i) the amount of revenue generated within the redevelopment 18project area, (ii) any expenditures made by the municipality 19for the redevelopment project area including without 20limitation expenditures from the special tax allocation fund, 21(iii) the status of planned activities, goals, and objectives 22set forth in the redevelopment plan including details on new 23or planned construction within the redevelopment project area, 24(iv) the amount of private and public investment within the 25redevelopment project area, and (v) any other relevant 26evaluation or performance data. Within 30 days after the   HB1142- 22 -LRB104 04065 RTM 14089 b1municipality compiles the status report, the municipality must 2hold at least one public hearing concerning the report. The 3municipality must provide 20 days' public notice of the 4hearing.5    (j) Beginning in fiscal year 2011 and in each fiscal year 6thereafter, a municipality must detail in its annual budget 7(i) the revenues generated from redevelopment project areas by 8source and (ii) the expenditures made by the municipality for 9redevelopment project areas. 10(Source: P.A. 102-127, eff. 7-23-21.) 11    (65 ILCS 5/11-74.4-6)  (from Ch. 24, par. 11-74.4-6)12    Sec. 11-74.4-6. (a) Except as provided herein, notice of 13the public hearing shall be given by publication and mailing; 14provided, however, that no notice by mailing shall be required 15under this subsection (a) with respect to any redevelopment 16project area located within a transit facility improvement 17area established pursuant to Section 11-74.4-3.3. Notice by 18publication shall be given by publication at least twice, the 19first publication to be not more than 30 nor less than 10 days 20prior to the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation 21within the taxing districts having property in the proposed 22redevelopment project area. Notice by mailing shall be given 23by depositing such notice in the United States mails by 24certified mail addressed to the person or persons in whose 25name the general taxes for the last preceding year were paid on   HB1142- 23 -LRB104 04065 RTM 14089 b1each lot, block, tract, or parcel of land lying within the 2project redevelopment area. Said notice shall be mailed not 3less than 10 days prior to the date set for the public hearing. 4In the event taxes for the last preceding year were not paid, 5the notice shall also be sent to the persons last listed on the 6tax rolls within the preceding 3 years as the owners of such 7property. For redevelopment project areas with redevelopment 8plans or proposed redevelopment plans that would require 9removal of 10 or more inhabited residential units or that 10contain 75 or more inhabited residential units, the 11municipality shall make a good faith effort to notify by mail 12all residents of the redevelopment project area. At a minimum, 13the municipality shall mail a notice to each residential 14address located within the redevelopment project area. The 15municipality shall endeavor to ensure that all such notices 16are effectively communicated and shall include (in addition to 17notice in English) notice in the predominant language other 18than English when appropriate.19    (a-5) For a public hearing for adoption of an ordinance 20designating a redevelopment project area under subsection (a) 21of Section 11-74.4-5, notice of the public hearing shall be 22given by publication and mailing, but no notice by mailing is 23required under this subsection with respect to a redevelopment 24project area located within a transit facility improvement 25area established pursuant to Section 11-74.4-3.3. Notice by 26publication shall be given by publication at least twice, the   HB1142- 24 -LRB104 04065 RTM 14089 b1first publication to be not more than 30 nor less than 10 days 2prior to the hearing if the hearing is before the date of the 3referendum or not more than 30 nor less than 10 days prior to 4the date of the election in which the referendum to approve the 5designation of the redevelopment project area if the date of 6the referendum is before the hearing date. Notice by 7publication must be in a newspaper of general circulation 8within the taxing districts having property in the proposed 9redevelopment project area. Notice by publication of the 10public hearing shall also be given by publication on the main 11page of the municipality's website, if it has a website, at 12least 30 days prior to the date of the election in which the 13referendum to approve the designation of the redevelopment 14project area. Notice by mailing shall be given by depositing 15the notice in the United States mails by certified mail 16addressed to every registered voter residing within the taxing 17districts that constitute the joint review board under 18subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-5. The mailed notice shall 19be mailed not less than 10 days prior to the date set for the 20public hearing. The municipality shall endeavor to ensure that 21all of the notice under this subsection are effectively 22communicated and shall include (in addition to notice in 23English) notice in the predominant language other than English 24when appropriate. 25    (b) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the 26The notices issued pursuant to this Section shall include the   HB1142- 25 -LRB104 04065 RTM 14089 b1following:2        (1) The time and place of public hearing.3        (2) The boundaries of the proposed redevelopment 4    project area by legal description and by street location 5    where possible.6        (3) A notification that all interested persons will be 7    given an opportunity to be heard at the public hearing.8        (4) A description of the redevelopment plan or 9    redevelopment project for the proposed redevelopment 10    project area if a plan or project is the subject matter of 11    the hearing.12        (5) A copy of the proposed ordinance designating the 13    redevelopment project area. 14        (6) A list of all taxes levied by each of the taxing 15    districts that constitute the joint review board under 16    subsection (b) of Section 11-74.4-5, and a statement of 17    the projected impact that the redevelopment project area 18    will have on those taxing district. 19        (7) The proposed referendum language. 20        (8) (5) Such other matters as the municipality may 21    deem appropriate.22    Paragraphs (5), (6), and (7) only apply to notices under 23subsection (a-1). 24    (c) Not less than 45 days prior to the date set for 25hearing, the municipality shall give notice by mail as 26provided in subsection (a) to all taxing districts of which   HB1142- 26 -LRB104 04065 RTM 14089 b1taxable property is included in the redevelopment project 2area, project or plan and to the Department of Commerce and 3Economic Opportunity, and in addition to the other 4requirements under subsection (b) the notice shall include an 5invitation to the Department of Commerce and Economic 6Opportunity and each taxing district to submit comments to the 7municipality concerning the subject matter of the hearing 8prior to the date of hearing.9    (d) In the event that any municipality has by ordinance 10adopted tax increment financing prior to 1987, and has 11complied with the notice requirements of this Section, except 12that the notice has not included the requirements of 13subsection (b), paragraphs (2), (3) and (4), and within 90 14days of December 16, 1991 (the effective date of Public Act 1587-813), that municipality passes an ordinance which contains 16findings that: (1) all taxing districts prior to the time of 17the hearing required by Section 11-74.4-5 were furnished with 18copies of a map incorporated into the redevelopment plan and 19project substantially showing the legal boundaries of the 20redevelopment project area; (2) the redevelopment plan and 21project, or a draft thereof, contained a map substantially 22showing the legal boundaries of the redevelopment project area 23and was available to the public at the time of the hearing; and 24(3) since the adoption of any form of tax increment financing 25authorized by this Act, and prior to June 1, 1991, no objection 26or challenge has been made in writing to the municipality in   HB1142- 27 -LRB104 04065 RTM 14089 b1respect to the notices required by this Section, then the 2municipality shall be deemed to have met the notice 3requirements of this Act and all actions of the municipality 4taken in connection with such notices as were given are hereby 5validated and hereby declared to be legally sufficient for all 6purposes of this Act.7    (e) If a municipality desires to propose a redevelopment 8plan for a redevelopment project area that would result in the 9displacement of residents from 10 or more inhabited 10residential units or for a redevelopment project area that 11contains 75 or more inhabited residential units, the 12municipality shall hold a public meeting before the mailing of 13the notices of public hearing as provided in subsection (c) of 14this Section. However, such a meeting shall be required for 15any redevelopment plan for a redevelopment project area 16located within a transit facility improvement area established 17pursuant to Section 11-74.4-3.3 if the applicable project is 18subject to the process for evaluation of environmental effects 19under the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969, 42 U.S.C. 204321 et seq. The meeting shall be for the purpose of enabling 21the municipality to advise the public, taxing districts having 22real property in the redevelopment project area, taxpayers who 23own property in the proposed redevelopment project area, and 24residents in the area as to the municipality's possible intent 25to prepare a redevelopment plan and designate a redevelopment 26project area and to receive public comment. The time and place   HB1142- 28 -LRB104 04065 RTM 14089 b1for the meeting shall be set by the head of the municipality's 2Department of Planning or other department official designated 3by the mayor or city or village manager without the necessity 4of a resolution or ordinance of the municipality and may be 5held by a member of the staff of the Department of Planning of 6the municipality or by any other person, body, or commission 7designated by the corporate authorities. The meeting shall be 8held at least 14 business days before the mailing of the notice 9of public hearing provided for in subsection (c) of this 10Section.11    Notice of the public meeting shall be given by mail. 12Notice by mail shall be not less than 15 days before the date 13of the meeting and shall be sent by certified mail to all 14taxing districts having real property in the proposed 15redevelopment project area and to all entities requesting that 16information that have registered with a person and department 17designated by the municipality in accordance with registration 18guidelines established by the municipality pursuant to Section 1911-74.4-4.2. The municipality shall make a good faith effort 20to notify all residents and the last known persons who paid 21property taxes on real estate in a redevelopment project area. 22This requirement shall be deemed to be satisfied if the 23municipality mails, by regular mail, a notice to each 24residential address and the person or persons in whose name 25property taxes were paid on real property for the last 26preceding year located within the redevelopment project area.   HB1142- 29 -LRB104 04065 RTM 14089 b1Notice shall be in languages other than English when 2appropriate. The notices issued under this subsection shall 3include the following:4        (1) The time and place of the meeting.5        (2) The boundaries of the area to be studied for 6    possible designation as a redevelopment project area by 7    street and location.8        (3) The purpose or purposes of establishing a 9    redevelopment project area.10        (4) A brief description of tax increment financing.11        (5) The name, telephone number, and address of the 12    person who can be contacted for additional information 13    about the proposed redevelopment project area and who 14    should receive all comments and suggestions regarding the 15    development of the area to be studied.16        (6) Notification that all interested persons will be 17    given an opportunity to be heard at the public meeting.18        (7) Such other matters as the municipality deems 19    appropriate.20    At the public meeting, any interested person or 21representative of an affected taxing district may be heard 22orally and may file, with the person conducting the meeting, 23statements that pertain to the subject matter of the meeting.24(Source: P.A. 99-792, eff. 8-12-16; 100-201, eff. 8-18-17.) 25    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 26becoming law.